Massachusetts, session 194th, H684.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 71 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by adding
at the end thereof the following section 68A:--
Section 2. For purposes of this section, “disposable menstrual products” means products
including, but not limited to, tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the
menstrual cycle.
Section 3. All elementary and secondary public schools in the Commonwealth serving
students in any grade from grade six through grade twelve shall provide disposable menstrual
products in the restrooms of such school building or buildings. Such products shall be provided
at no charge to students. Such amount may be adjusted from time to time based on utilization.
of 2

School districts shall work to ensure that such products shall be available in a convenient manner
that does not stigmatize any student seeking such product.
Section 4. This act shall take effect on August 1, 2026.
of 2